District of Columbia statutes.
31-3255

Applicability.

This subchapter shall apply, 120 days after the promulgation of the final regulations pursuant to § 31-3254, to health insurers, as defined in § 31-3251(5), and any agency, organization, facility, or distinct part thereof, licensed pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 44.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-96, § 105, 49 DCR 991